_	The Association particularly opposed the implication that the damage caused by Dr Joy to New Zealand's international reputation and potential loss of tourists was of greater importance than "the need for truth in public debate".
_	Often, the initial materials include heavy promotion of expensive seminars or classes, with the implication that not purchasing these items means the reader is not "serious" or "ready to make money".
_	For Lord Charlemont, Hogarth chose to paint the satirical "Piquet, or Virtue in Danger" (also known as "The Lady's Last Stake", after a 1708 play by Colley Cibber), which, with echoes of "Marriage à-la-Mode", shows an army officer offering an aristocratic lady a chance to recover the fortune she has just lost by gambling (with the implication that if she loses again, she will have to take him as her lover).
_	By leaving out the condemnation of the "killing of innocents" entirely, Mohammed El Oifi, writing in "Le Monde diplomatique", argued that this translation left the implication that civilians (the innocent) are considered a legitimate target.
_	Bitch slap has also been used in American prisons since the 1990s to refer to slapping instead of punching, with the implication that the perpetrator isn't "man enough" to deliver a closed-fist punch.
_	The story makes several statements considered radical at the time: that the USSR would decisively win the space race; that the Russians were not inhuman monsters willing to destroy everything if it meant killing other people; and the implication that the United States attacked with atomic bombs first.
_	However, the team disliked this idea, as they had used ropes rather than climbing towers in their sessions, and furthermore did not appreciate the implication that their work was useless or silly.
_	During a confrontation with a returned minor villain the Getaway Genius, Damian is initially angry that Grayson failed to capture the foe – as well as the implication that his father failed as well during the Genius' original run back when Grayson was Robin – but when Dick explains to him that Bruce let the Genius go because he discovered that the Genius' robberies were only him stealing medicines that he needed so that he could live long enough to see his daughter grow up, Damian realises that he never really knew his father as a person, and admits that there was more to him than Batman.
_	On 24 March 2016, the group's official Facebook page posted an image of the mixing board at Brian O'Shaughnessy's Bark Studios in London, with the implication that the group were recording new material.
_	When pensioners or retirees are dependent on their pension as their dominant source of income, the term "fixed income" can also carry the implication that they have relatively limited discretionary income or have little financial freedom to make large or discretionary expenditures.
_	One student of Plato (who would become another of the most influential philosophers of all time) stressed the implication that understanding relies upon first-hand observation.
_	Davy had already sympathised with the view that heat was associated with molecular motion rather than with Joseph Black's caloric theory of heat but he rejected Herapath's paper with some coolness, uncomfortable with the implication that there was an absolute zero of temperature at which all motion ceased.
_	The mapping often has the implication that it covers borderline cases where two language varieties may be considered strongly divergent dialects of the same language or very closely related languages (dialect continuums).
_	It is characterized by overly-aggressive or domineering social behaviour, and carries the implication that such behaviour is compensatory for the subject's stature.
_	However, because of the implication that it represented white British and Afrikaners uniting against blacks, ""Ex Unitate Vires"" was replaced in 2000 as the national motto of South Africa by "!ke e: /xarra //ke" (Xam: Unity Through Diversity").
_	In a 2004 paper, LeeAnn Whites, a professor of Civil War history at the school, repeated a version of it in which Gaines had been on his way to enroll at the school as an undergraduate and had disappeared from a train traveling across the state, with the implication that he was murdered.
_	Jailbait or jail bait is slang for a person who is younger than the legal age of consent for sexual activity, with the implication that a person above the age of consent might find them sexually attractive.
_	The high levels of glycerol (known to expedite protein maturation) on ASIC2 surface also aids in the implication that regulation of these channels' function is reliant on protein maturation.
_	Martha also reveals the truth about George's creative writing escapades: he had tried to publish a novel about a boy who accidentally killed both of his parents (with the implication that the deaths were actually murder), but Martha's father would not let it be published.
_	British officials were therefore irritated by the implication that sovereignty was negotiable.
_	Algis Budrys in 1965 wrote of the "recurrent strain in 'Golden Age' science fiction of the 1940's—the implication that sheer technological accomplishment would solve all the problems, hooray, and that all the problems were what they seemed to be on the surface".
_	Although acting as "Master of the Chapel" for the sect, Satie was frustrated by the implication that he was a disciple of Péladan.
_	The most direct way to incorporate a language other than English would be to either simply present it in the foreign form and leave the reader in the unknown or translate it completely into English with the implication that it is meant to be in Japanese and move on.
_	Conversely, what Goethe's "Auch ich in Arkadien" says is "Even I managed to get to paradise", with the implication that we could all get there if we chose.
_	This aids in the implication that HAND1 expression is a factor to patients suffering from congenital heart disease.
_	This usage is often critical, with the implication that use of true names is difficult to enforce and unwise to rely on.
_	Likewise, the phrase "What's good (or: is sauce) for the goose is good (sauce) for the gander," suggesting that minor, irrelevant differences do not affect the permissibility of some behavior, so if it is permissible for one person (the "goose") then it is also permissible for any very similar person (a "gander")-with the implication that if someone rejects the second judgment, they must either explain why the different between the two cases is morally relevant, or retract their judgment of the first case.
_	These include the implication that Islamophobia is merely a mental illness which affects only very small segments of society, the implied separation of religion from other relevant factors such as skin color, concerns about terrorism, and immigration, and the implied overlap between those who are hostile to religion in general and those are hostile to Islam or Muslims in particular.
_	The third component also contains the implication that either the application itself is provided with the backup, or there is a consistent and ongoing application upgrade path to prevent the situation where the restore of a RUB is prevented due to an obsolete version of application software.
_	Consequently, Churchill had agreed that tens of thousands of veteran Polish troops under British command should lose their Kresy homes to the Soviet Union, with the implication that relatives including wives and children would be at the mercy of the NKVD.
_	After this exchange, he bids her a final farewellbut at her requestphrasing it with the implication that they may meet again.
_	Irvine charged that Gard appeared to be trying to use Austen as a way of furthering his opposition to British membership in the European Union, with his dichotomy between Austen's England with its "clear" style and "unpolitical" way of life vs. the presumably muddled style and "political" way of life of continental Europe with the implication that the two do not belong together.
_	Edric is aghast, grasping the implication that Gino intends to murder Peter.
_	Richard Owen and Thomas Henry Huxley had already clashed on man's position in nature two days previously; on the Saturday, at the Oxford University Museum of Natural History, Wilberforce got his chance to criticise Charles Darwin's "On the Origin of Species by means of Natural Selection", especially the implication that humans and various species of apes share common ancestors.
_	However, he also advocated a policy of "fair prices" and "fair profits", with the implication that anything higher would be impious.
_	Ettore and the Italian soldiers decide to remain there to delay the advance of Novak's soldiers, who are chasing them, accepting the implication that they will likely not survive the fight.
_	Comparison of a man to a child-bearing woman was a common insult in Scandinavia, and the implication that Loki may be bisexual was considered an insult.
_	Jarrett accepted the match, with the implication that Sting put his career on the line, a stipulation Sting accepted.
_	A 1988 book by Canadian author Peter Edwards, "Waterfront Warlord" corrected several errors in the film, including the implication that Banks had his nemesis John Droeger killed.
_	Gough also scoffed at the implication that Haig had disapproved of his breakthrough attempt but had done nothing to stop it, and that even the corps commanders had warned of Gough's mistakes.
_	However, there's another word "5 US cent (五美分)" used by some netizens to denigrate anti-party comments, with the implication that those commentators are hired by the governments of the United States, Taiwan or other western countries.
_	Taylor was angered by some of the criticism, especially the implication that he had set out to exonerate Hitler, writing that "to the best of my recollection, those who now display indignation against me were not active [against appeasement] on the public platform."
_	In theoretical models this often has the implication that decision-making is unaffected by scale.
_	In 1994, after United States Secretary of Energy Hazel R. O'Leary said the 1992 United Nations Framework Convention on Climate Change needed to be strengthened, and that voluntary carbon dioxide reductions may not be enough, GCC said it was: "disturbed by the implication that the President's voluntary climate action plan, which is just getting under way, will be inadequate and that more stringent measures may be needed domestically."
_	The term carries the implication that the referent is superior in some way, whether specified or not.
_	The film ends ambiguously with the implication that she may attempt to seduce Wiglaf.
_	The text received widespread attention when first publicized in 2012 for the implication that some early Christians believed that Jesus was married.
_	The literal translation is about a size difference between a kaiju and a daikaiju, with the implication that the daikaiju is the greater of the two types.
_	Music journalist James Hector suggests that the line "I think I better just sing one more song" is more telling than the band intended, noting the implication that the group was recording the song to fulfill their contractual obligations to their record company.
_	The supposed relevance of this incident to Morosi is the implication that as Cairns' private secretary, Morosi was to blame for any disorganisation present in Cairns' office that may have contributed to him signing the infamous letter but not remembering having done so.
_	"The personal reflects the political status quo (with the implication that the personal should be examined to provide insight into the political); the personal serves the political status quo; one can make personal choices in response to or protest against the political status quo; ... one's personal choices reveal or reflect one's personal politics; one should make personal choices that are consistent with one's personal politics; personal life and personal politics are indistinguishable."
_	Finally, the film cuts back to Scotty masturbating, with the implication that the phone call and all that followed was only a masturbatory fantasy.
_	In the "Estoire" he is invested as bishop by an apparition of Jesus with the implication that he was the first to receive his orders.
_	[I.e., the final “yud,” which denotes the plural, is missing, hence the implication that the Leviathan did not remain two, but that its number was reduced to one.]
_	Arthur refers to his wife, who never appeared, as "'er indoors"; the implication that she is a fierce and formidable woman is reinforced by the appearance of actress Claire Davenport (famous for such roles) as her sister.
_	The word "fleașcă" translates roughly to "soaking wet" and may describe something being ruined through soaking or similar means, or "soft/no erect", and it may refer in slang to "pussy", with the implication that it is wet or aroused, or to a soft man which does not stand for his rights, with allusion to his "erection".
_	The Philosopher is arrested for murder after the neighbouring Leprecauns of Gort na Clocha Mora (whose crock of gold has been taken) lay information with the police that the two friends who shared the Philosopher's house have died, with the implication that they have been killed.
_	The phrase was also used with the implication that Microsoft employees were motivated only by money, rather than software quality, "e.g." in a 2000 "Wired" article on "United States v. Microsoft":
_	The character's clothing lines would later be referenced on occasion in various "Teen Titans" books, with the implication that Mod is a popular clothing designer on par with other real world fashion designers in the DC Universe.
_	It is sometimes intended as a pejorative, bearing the implication that the scarce medical research resources allocated to develop such drugs were spent frivolously when they could have been better spent researching cures for more serious medical conditions.
_	A "Nature" editorial commented on the implication that the plagiarised material in the retracted paper was likely to also be present in the earlier "infamous" Wegman Report, including allegations against Mann and his co-authors which had frequently been cited by climate-change sceptics.
_	The chapter ends with the implication that Miriam is about to be raped and murdered.
_	Disjunctive commands such "love me or leave me" or "fish or cut bait" tend to be asymmetric via the implication that one alternative is less preferable.
_	He is told that since he is from a non-member world (Ferenginar), he requires a letter of recommendation from a command-level officer before his application can be considered, with the implication that this is the standard procedure for all non-Federation applicants to Starfleet.
_	Nonetheless, the implication that Peck might have been involved with three women at once made for a titillating controversy.
_	Because of the notoriety of the neighborhood, Rollins suspected that this would bring trouble because of the implication that there was money in the home.
_	The 2016 tie-in book "The Secret History of Twin Peaks" (Flatiron Books, New York, ) states that Pete and Andrew were killed in the blast but that Audrey survived, with the implication that Pete saved Audrey by shielding her with his body.
_	As Yang became harsh and angry in tone during the argument, Zhao became displeased at the implication that Zhao himself was unfamiliar with late-Tang events, and Zhao also became apprehensive that Yang might act against him, as a close associate of the emperor.
_	It has been highlighted that this elevation of principles of natural justice to constitutional status, with the implication that they may override local statutes due to the supremacy of the Constitution over them, creates some tension with Article 38 which vests the law-making power of Singapore in the legislature.
_	Tarski and Givant (1987) applied relation algebra to a variable-free treatment of axiomatic set theory, with the implication that mathematics founded on set theory could itself be conducted without variables.
_	Among these groups are comic-book fandom, media fandom, the Society for Creative Anachronism, gaming, and furry fandom, sometimes referred to collectively as "fringe fandoms" with the implication that the original fandom centered on science-fiction texts (magazines and later books and fanzines) is the "true" or "core" fandom.
_	Tensions were raised further with the agreement that male Falkland Islanders would not have to undertake conscription into the Argentine Army, since this carried the implication that Falkland Islanders were Argentine citizens.
_	In John 18, Pilate refers to the implication that the Christ is a royal title by inquiring explicitly if Jesus claims to be the "king of the Jews" (βασιλεὺς τῶν Ἰουδαίων).
_	Even after 1790 Mozart writes about "the rehearsal", with the implication that his concerts would have only one rehearsal.
_	The novel ends with the implication that the remaining Supermyx bombs will be detonated, wiping humanity from the face of the earth.
_	Even though they are now together, the novel concludes with the implication that she will continue to volunteer herself to those who have need of her.
_	"What's so dishonest about Channel 4's defence of "Brass Eye" as a satire of media forms is the implication that they (and the liberal left in general) have a better truth than the tabloids.
_	The Roman routes from Wall and Alcester were together named Icknield Street during the later Medieval period, though the implication that they were viewed as a single route by the Romans may be misleading, and it is possible that the road from Droitwich was originally the more important of the two southern routes.
_	By sending Winkler, Karpov has thwarted a British publicity victory as Irvine understood the implication that Petrofsky must not be captured alive or exposed in the media.
_	In April 1972, after Nelson recorded "Mountain Dew", his final RCA single, the label requested that he renew his contract ahead of schedule, with the implication that RCA would not release any further recordings if he did not sign.
_	Similarly, the Dickinson Complaint alleges that Defendant's statements contain numerous implications about Dickinson, including the implication that 'Dickinson has copied the claims made publicly by other women against Defendant' and 'the implication that Ms. Dickinson's rape disclosure is a lie and that therefore she is a liar'", she wrote.
_	Kramer tells her that that's impossible and she says that's what her boyfriend told her (with the implication that her boyfriend gave her gonorrhea, and that she was rather gullible and believed him).
_	During a subsequent case involving a polygamist who would spend the night with his first wife on the night he was scheduled to sleep alone, Booth commented that, while you can love several people, there is only ever one person you love the most, prompting Brennan to ask what happens when you push that person away, something Booth answered saying that it never truly leaves, adding further weight to the implication that he still has feelings for Brennan.
_	Colony-nesting birds often show synchrony in their breeding, meaning that chicks all hatch at once, with the implication that any predator coming along at that time would find more prey items than it could possibly eat.
_	Immersive digital environments could be thought of as synonymous with virtual reality, but without the implication that actual "reality" is being simulated.
_	"Late capitalism" is a term used by Marxists to refer to capitalism from about 1945 onwards, with the implication that it is due to come to an end.
_	Scholars have observed that Justice Kennedy's majority opinion "embraced "Bustamonte's" premise that when police request consent to search, the request itself carries the implication that an alternative of refusal exists".
_	The second possibility is that the link between saturated fats and CHD is valid, but that some additional factor in the French diet or lifestyle mitigates this risk—presumably with the implication that if this factor can be identified, it can be incorporated into the diet and lifestyle of other countries, with the same lifesaving implications observed in France.
_	Though her tattoos were still imposed from an outside individual, the implication that her father completed them suggests that the imposition came from within Western cultural practices rather than external ones.
_	"Rights of Man" denounces Burke's assertion of the nobility's inherent "hereditary wisdom"; countering the implication that a nation has not a right to form a Government for governing itself.
_	Clumsily constructed and hollowly acted, it's a project that its lead performers – William Hurt and Julia Ormond – along with Barbra Streisand's Barwood Films, should quickly try to bury in their resumes ... Writer-director Lionel Chetwynd fudges a lot of facts, beginning with the implication that Fry founded the Emergency Rescue Committee.
_	Some opponents have said that users may feel belittled by the implication that "certain people" are confused by wiki markup and therefore need the VisualEditor.
_	The story ends with the implication that the shogunate will rebuild the country with the people's help.
_	The announcement received widespread coverage due to the implication that the decision to build a backup archive in a foreign country was because of the upcoming presidency of Donald Trump.
_	So in this case, the appropriate construction of a company's articles led to the implication that a director could be removed from office by shareholders (and did not have a job for life), even though a literal construction would have meant no person possessed the two classes of shares required to remove that director under the articles.
_	Europe are generally known as ultras which derives from the Latin word ultrā, meaning "beyond" in English, with the implication that their enthusiasm is 'beyond' the normal.
_	The Church, upon appeal to the Commission, argued that the implication that it did not comply with the Commission's EEO requirements violated its constitutional right to religious freedom by improperly evaluating its recruitment efforts and employment criteria.
_	When asked about the practice of culling healthy puppies (with the implication that killing them was what was meant), Kennel Club chairman Ronnie Irving denied knowledge of such practices and said that they were not acceptable.
_	The campaign received significant criticism decades later for being misogynistic, with the implication that it was the fault of wives for letting their husbands leave home with dirty collars.
_	The climax of the original version of the "Down in It" music video ended with the implication that Reznor's corn starch-covered character had fallen off a building and died in the street.
_	Speakers of the stronger language may characterize the weaker language as a "dialect" of the strong language, with the implication that it has no independent existence.
_	Others, such as Marston's Oyster Stout, use the name with the implication that the beer would be suitable for drinking with oysters.
_	When Randy complains to the manager, he invests money in a portfolio, but the money also disappears (with the implication that the manager was transferring the money into his own account); a recession then hits the nation and South Park.
_	The term is almost always used critically, with the implication that the character was used transparently as a plot device.
_	The first paragraph depicts the judgment day, where the angels in heaven tremble at the awe-inspiring event of the annual judgment of all creation, with the implication that man should also approach this day with trepidation.
_	He was also unhappy with the tone of the piece, entitled "The Autumn of John Ford", because he resented the implication that his time as a director was nearing its end.
_	After recording his final RCA single – "Mountain Dew" (backed with "Phases, Stages, Circles, Cycles and Scenes") in late April 1972, RCA requested that Nelson renew his contract ahead of schedule, with the implication that RCA would not release his latest recordings if he did not.
_	Interpretations that Justinian never forgot that it was Theodora who had saved his throne depend on seeing Procopius' account as a straightforward report, and not framed to impugn Justinian with the implication that he was more cowardly than his wife.
_	(Perhaps the only element of fantasy is the implication that the city’s departments could function so smoothly together.)
_	Pressler's firing was publicly portrayed by Duke as a resignation, which gave rise to the implication that the coach resigned due to the students' presumed guilt.
_	One feature in both films is Otis' taste for sexual violence: the implication that he is a rapist and necrophiliac with female victims of the first movie is confirmed in the sequel, where he also sexually assaults one of his hostages with a gun (a scene Moseley talks about on the DVD and is visibly horrified by).
_	This gives the implication that it is within these BIR motifs that contains the anti-apoptotic function of these IAPs.
_	They hold that should be analyzed as (a pronoun prefix meaning "it", with the implication that whatever follows is considered a permanent condition of the item) + ("to spill") + ("creek" or "stream"); thus the rough translation should be "continuously-spilling creek" or "continuously-giving creek", with the word for "creek" used instead of the word for "river" because the Ohio River flows into a larger river, the Mississippi.
_	He offered guarded approval of some of Ye'or's ideas, but also wrote: "I’d strongly question the implication that the entire European political establishment has been in on the effort to unite Europe and the Arab world, and to this end has labored to encourage immigration and discourage integration."
_	According to David Hart, Comte had three main points: "firstly, that interference by the state over the centuries in property ownership has had dire consequences for justice as well as for economic productivity; secondly, that property is legitimate when it emerges in such a way as not to harm anyone; and thirdly, that historically some, but by no means all, property which has evolved has done so legitimately, with the implication that the present distribution of property is a complex mixture of legitimately and illegitimately held titles."
_	A January 2007 story in The Herald on Sunday estimated the New Zealand online DVD rental market at 15000 subscribers, with the implication that Movieshack was the smallest of the three major online DVD rental companies (the others being Fatso and DVD Unlimited).
_	VI had signed a ten-year truce with Alfonso VIII of Castile, with the implication that he would aid the king of Murcia to attack Alfonso of Aragon.
_	While this approach can produce effective responses to critical situations under stress, the protocols involved must be viewed as having limited generalizability beyond the domain for which they were developed, with the implication that solutions in this discipline may provide only generic frameworks to a theory and practice of cognitive bias mitigation.
_	"Postumus" was an uncommon praenomen, presumably because its original meaning, "hindmost, last", referring to a youngest child, was easily confused with the similar sounding "post humus", "after burial", with the implication that the child's father was dead.
_	In the episode "Sleepless in Peckham" Del gives the implication that his father was also a physically abusive man who used to beat women and children, including Joan and Del.
_	Many patients, on the other hand, reject the implication that their problems are "all in their head", and feel their symptoms have a physical cause.
_	He eventually recovers and the family is reunited once more, with the implication that Sue will return to her position as wife and mother.
_	But the homophonic prefix eu-, meaning "good," also resonates in the word, with the implication that the perfectly "good place" is really "no place."
_	Despite the implication that the elimination decision would be based solely on the previous challenge, the experts ultimately decide to base it on the entire history of the three teams so far.
_	but Harris was criticized for exaggerating the point of "parental upbringing seems to matter less than previously thought" to the implication that "parents do not matter".
_	Some Protestants, including R. V. Tasker and D. Hill, generally relate these brothers and sisters to the indication that Joseph "knew her not "until" after she brought forth her firstborn" and the implication that Joseph and Mary had customary marital relations thereafter.
_	The film ends with the implication that Uffizi, who has missed the morning purge of his vampiric curse, has become the new vampire lord.
_	By definition, the notion of “postgraduate” (United States) carries the implication that the candidate undertaking such research has already completed a formal Master's degree and at some instances the PhD, at an accredited university or tertiary institution.
_	Dirac, who had just then been intensely involved with working out the foundations of Heisenberg's matrix mechanics, immediately understood that these conditions could be met if , , and are "matrices", with the implication that the wave function has "multiple components".
_	Residents were grouped into fuochi (fireplaces) with the implication that each fireplace served as a gathering place for one family unit.
_	In the final part of the story, with the implication that he is about to be lynched by a gathering mob, he "softly hum[s] the 'Song of the Bride in German, (Du Bois 176).
_	The tense-marker "-zika-" is sometimes used in place of "-zidza-", perhaps with the implication that the events will take place elsewhere:
_	The Beyonder is proclaimed to be an Inhuman who was a mutant before he was exposed to the Terrigen Mists, as well as the implication that the events of Secret Wars II never really happened and took place within an asteroid replica of Earth the Beyonder created, and that Black Bolt, under the guise as the Beyonder's "king", convinced him to go into another dimensional exile); as such, the canonical status of Secret Wars II is unknown.
_	This example illustrates how reciprocal causation is not a rejection of the proximate-ultimate distinction itself, but instead a rejection of the implication that developmental processes should not feature in evolutionary explanations.
_	He feared the men in the audience would be insulted by the implication that they didn't already know the rules (even if they didn't), but would accept that James was merely explaining things for the benefit of women viewers.
_	Jailbait is slang for a minor who is younger than the age of consent for sexual activity, with the implication that an older person might find him or her sexually attractive.
_	After the premiere screening at Sundance, in March 2016, D'Amato filed a federal lawsuit against the filmmakers for making false accusations, including the implication that D'Amato used extortion and abused minors, and stating that D'Amato has no relationship with O'Brien Media.
_	He tried to demonstrate that no energy is lost in muscle movement, motivated by the implication that there were no "vital forces" necessary to move a muscle.
_	The Korean title for "The King and the Clown" is "왕의 남자" which translates as ""The King's Man"" with the implication that it refers to the man as being the King's lover.
_	A secondary plot involved Richards' search for a brother he has never known, with the implication that that brother may share his gift and thus be at risk from unscrupulous billionaires as well.
_	Gunson charges that this edit is itself a misrepresentation, stating that the film does not mention that both sets of marchers were fired upon, and taking issue with the implication that "coup plotters" were the shooters.
_	There were indications that the Labour Government was looking at ways of subsidising the scheme by charging other Government Departments, with the implication that this would result in increased charges for other Government services to individuals or businesses.
_	Carina Chocano from "The New York Times" has offered similar criticism for the "shorthand meme" of strong female characters; while she sees them as a "gateway drug" to realistic representation, she takes offense at the implication that female characters are "not interesting or worth identifying with" if they are not cold, flawless, and masculine.
_	The chief characteristics from which it derives its name are its temporary location in the place to which the collections of books is sent and the implication that any traveling library will or may be changed for another collection of books.
_	The movie ends with the Great American Carnival continuing on its way, with Donna her own woman rather than Frankie's girlfriend, Frankie and the Patch reconciled, and the implication that in a season or two Heavy will retire and Patch will be the one running the show.
_	The term "emotional support helpline" is sometimes used to avoid the implication that a caller must be in crisis to use services.
_	Lamon was sent concurrently with another Illinois friend of Lincoln's, Stephen Hurlbut, with the implication that Lamon was sent to take the focus off of Hurlbut's visit as Hurlbut was there to measure anti-Union sentiment in Charleston (he discovered it was high).
_	Accusing a game of being a clone carries the implication that its developers or publishers try to profit off of the exemplar's success.
_	Sometimes it begins with the assistant restraining the magician, with the implication that in this way the assistant is gaining "revenge" for all the other tricks they do where the assistant is put in a box.
_	An absolute approach can also be applied to time, with, for instance, the implication that there might have been vast epochs of time before the first event.
_	National won the 1975 election, helped by an (in)famous television advertisement of "Dancing Cossacks" and the implication that Labour’s proposed Superannuation scheme would lead to state control.
_	The numbers were dropped in order to avoid the implication that it would be limited to producing 32-bit binaries.
_	She walks for hours, sits on a bench and smokes, and is confronted by a police officer, with the implication that she could be perceived as a "streetwalker."
_	In the 1970s she had "championed" use of the word for the female genitalia, thinking it "shouldn't be abusive"; she rejected the "proper" word "vagina", a Latin name meaning "sword-sheath" originally applied by male anatomists to all muscle coverings (see synovial sheath) – not just because it refers only to the internal canal but also because of the implication that the female body is "simply a receptacle for a weapon".
_	Generally used with the implication that the person concerned is unsuited to the new social position, esp. through lacking the necessary manners or accomplishments."
_	Friedrich Paulus was promoted with the implication that he would die in futile military action or commit suicide.
_	On the second day, according to the recollection of Jack MacBryan, recounted in David Foot's history of Somerset cricket, "Sunshine, Sixes and Cider", Heygate remained in a blue serge suit with the implication that he would take no further part in the match.
_	In May 2009, a row broke out when it was revealed that ten Senate members had been on an all-expense-paid trip to Ghana, with the implication that they were being influenced by Petroleum and Gas producers.
_	The first accusation lobbied against Paneb is the charge that he gave Preemhab five of Neferhotep's servants, with the implication that this gift is what secured the position for Paneb, not any legitimate claim to be chief workman.
_	Rosella ultimately finds a romantic interest in Prince Edgar, whom she rescues with the implication that they may marry in the future.
_	Essentially, the term MK person, which carries a rather negative undertone, is often used to describe a person who blindly follows trends without thought with the implication that they have a poor taste or behaves in a bad way.
_	The only cognomen of the Afranii in the time of the Republic is "Stellio", referring to a spotted newt or lizard, perhaps with the implication that the bearer was crafty.
_	When he is unsuccessful in corroborating Templeton's work Haynes confronts Templeton a second time and Templeton tells Haynes that he resents the implication that his work is fabricated.
_	He was criticized by Derrick Jensen for the implication that the characterization of other feminists as "transphobic" is legitimate.
_	NBC objected to the implication that an afternoon at the rodeo was wasted and the line had to be changed.
_	One is the implication that great books are concerned only with ideas which can be logically analyzed—whereas many masterpieces of literature live in realms partially or wholly outside the realm of logic.
_	The blue lantern symbol shining in Larfleeze's eyes gives the implication that his avaricious tendencies have been somewhat tempered.
_	The metaphor is based on the implication that the person is fundamentally like the cookie, "black on the outside and white on the inside".
_	One heavy criticism which he bore stoically was the implication that Jews could never put Germany first; the idea that the Jews were "our misfortune," as the German nationalist historian Heinrich Treitschke wrote, led to the proliferation from 1880s of anti-Semitic parties.
_	Polonsky writes that the term 'bystander' is problematic, because "the implication that the bystanders had free choice, as in the parable of the good Samaritan, either to assist the Jews or go on their way fails to take into account the nature of Nazi rule."
_	Scottish heraldry operates under the implication that everyone who shares the same surname might be related.
_	Supporting evidence for this theory includes the implication that Ligeia is from Germany, a main source of Gothic fiction in the 19th century, and that the description of her hints at much but says nothing, especially in the description of her eyes.
_	Strabo notes that the Turdetani were the most civilized peoples in Iberia, with the implication that their ordered, urbanized culture was most in accord with Greco-Roman models.
_	The ending of the film was apparently changed at some point, as the original program describes Stewart and Arthur returning to Smith's hometown, where they are met by a big parade, with the implication that they are married and starting a family.
_	Economists Kenneth Arrow and John Harsanyi criticized the assumptions of the original position, and in particular, the use of maximin reasoning, with the implication that Rawls' selection of parameters for the original position was result-oriented, "i.e.", calculated to derive the two principles that Rawls desired to advance, and/or, as the "contractarian critique" holds, that the persons in the original position articulated by Rawls would not in fact select the principles that "A Theory of Justice" advocates.
_	Originally, the film was to end as Taymor's 1994 production had, with the implication that Lucius is going to kill Aaron's baby, but during production of the film, actor Angus Macfadyen, who played Lucius, convinced Taymor that Lucius was an honourable man and wouldn't go back on his word.
_	The relational theory of space is a metaphysical theory according to which space is composed of relations between objects, with the implication that it cannot exist in the absence of matter.
_	Bertha Palmer, president of the fair's Board of Lady Managers and president of the woman's branch of the World’s Congress Auxiliary's, and Ellen Henrotin, vice president of the auxiliary’s woman's branch, viewed Sewall as a radical feminist and resented the implication that the National Council of Women was organizing the World's Congress.
_	In the end, Jake gets her contract back and she and Nick begin to sing another song with the implication that they will continue their budding relationship together.
_	The use of tautological implication means that other possible deductions exist besides "No "X"s are "Z"s"; the criterion for a successful deduction is that the 1s under the sub-major connective on the right "include" all the 1s under the sub-major connective on the left (the "major" connective being the implication that results in the tautology).
_	For the more challenging task of opposing the "Origin", and the implication that man descended from apes, he had been assiduously coached by Richard Owen – Owen stayed with him the night before the debate.
_	A chance meeting with the Taliban in North West Pakistan led to their inviting Casey to be their guest in Afghanistan, with the implication that he might be introduced to Osama Bin Laden; but he did not take up the invitation.
_	Lepenies comments that Wolters misunderstood the degree of pessimism being expressed about science, but well understood the implication that scientists themselves could be trusted with self-criticism.
_	As a reward for saving the colony of Jamaica from a French assault, he is appointed its governor in place of Colonel Bishop, who had abandoned his post to hunt for Blood, and the novel ends with the implication that Blood will not only marry Colonel Bishop's niece Arabella but will also let Bishop off easy.
_	This story also continues the implication that he is related to the Doctor, and further implies that he encouraged the Doctor to leave Gallifrey in the first place because the Time Lords wanted to kill him.
_	Although the term "silverware" is used irrespective of the material composition of the utensils, the term "tableware" has come into use to avoid the implication that they are made of silver.
_	A caricature of Tony Blair who makes a speech (later in front of an American flag to satirise his overtly US-friendly outlook), making repeated ludicrous promises such as "Magic beans for every household", "terrorism to be phased out by 2006" and "robots to cure cancer, made out of gold" with the odd realistic promise like "Post to be delivered on time" or "houses that people can actually afford" included, with the implication that they too are just as unlikely to be delivered.
_	Covenants in biblical times were often sealed by severing an animal, with the implication that the party who breaks the covenant will suffer a similar fate.
_	An-Najah rejected the motion and all the accusations: "Neither the University nor its Student Council is a terrorist organisation, and the implication that they are is insulting."
_	He also resents the implication that he could be bought by Jørgen.
_	In 2014, after having tested positive for performance-enhancing drugs, Tyson Gay, Drummond's former athlete, was investigated, leading to the implication that Drummond had "encouraged his use of the banned products and transported them for him."
_	He is the most important of many Halloween spirits, with the implication that their job is to scare people in the real world on Halloween night.
_	As a naval officer I abhor the implication that the Royal Navy is a haven for cannibalism.
_	She returns to Burgundy and lives with Georges though they have no sexual relationship; at the end of the book he dies, with the implication that he has been suffering from AIDS though this is not stated.
_	There is the implication that as a 13-year-old boy he planned to poison his father with strychnine, although it is never made clear whether he proceeded with this or how it was resolved.
_	The expressways were renumbered around 1965, to avoid the implication that through-traffic must change roads to stay on I-90 or I-94, resulting in I-90 being moved to the Indiana Toll Road, I-94 being moved to the Borman, and I-294 being cut back to the Tri-State Tollway and no longer entering Indiana.
_	There is also the implication that he had in fact fallen in love with Honorine himself, which is why he avoided marriage initially.
_	The style became widely known as intelligent drum and bass, although Bukem himself was opposed to the moniker, unhappy with the implication that other styles of jungle were not intelligent.
_	The company is named after Damballa, a Vodou snake god that protects against zombies, with the implication that Damballa protects against “zombie” computers operating as part of botnets.
_	A South African specimen studied with neutron tomography has shown evidence of an eardrum on its lower jaw with the implication that it was hearing impaired during the act of chewing.
_	On the screen was a text message reading "NOW!" giving the implication that the message was possibly a signal to begin a flash mob.
_	Results from studies that looked at these children indicated a large positive effect size after only 7 sessions, which provides the implication that children in crisis may respond more readily to treatment Parental involvement is also a significant predictor of positive play therapy results.
_	Hofmann admitted that he used Joseph Smith Sr.'s letter and the affidavit of Willard Chase ("Mormonism Unvailed", 1834), to create the implication that Joseph needed to take part of Alvin's body to the hill Cumorah.
_	("Vems flicka/pojke är du då" in Standard Swedish)) carries the implication that the asker might know the parents of the person asked, likely in a small society such as Åland.
_	The comic strip ends with the implication that revived Cybermen will, one day, still take over the planet.
_	In April 1972, after Nelson recorded "Mountain Dew", his final RCA single, the label requested that he renew his contract ahead of schedule, with the implication that RCA would not release any further recordings if he did not sign.
_	In politics, a lobbyist or an activist might use this phrase with the implication that the law in question should be abolished.
_	Other delegates—including future Bill of Rights drafter James Madison—disagreed, arguing that existing state guarantees of civil liberties were sufficient and that any attempt to enumerate individual rights risked the implication that other, unnamed rights were unprotected.
_	Nutting displayed four cabinets at the MOA show, one each in red, blue, white, and yellow, with the implication that the game was already in production, though they were in fact the only four cabinets then produced.
_	Bayliss is later shown cleaning out his desk, with the implication that he is quitting the force, despite telling Giardello that he is merely doing some spring-cleaning.
_	The BBC received complaints from viewers over the implication that Salmond had not answered a question put to him; there was a protest in Glasgow, in which between 1000 and 2000 protestors called for Robinson to be sacked.
_	The Cyclops then steals Silenus away into his cave, with the implication that he is about do something sexual to him.
_	While the band resents the implication that they would ever use another artist's work improperly and are assessing possible counterclaims, they are confident this situation will be satisfactorily resolved."
_	Just as the Perfect and the Past Simple both carry the implication that the action had an enduring effect which continues to the present time, so the Recent Past and Remote Past carry the opposite implication, that the action was not permanent but was reversed or cancelled by a later action.
_	The original version of the "Down in It" video ended with the implication that Reznor's character had fallen off a building and died in the street.
_	The two part as friends, with the implication that they could someday be something more.
_	Yatek having no love for the late Aeolia, is willing to discuss matters with Park, and there is the implication that Park will have a chance to become the new Lord of Charon.
_	In 1963, the school name was changed once more, to Kingsway College, reflecting a curriculum that included a complete academic program while decreasing the implication that the school was only a Bible college.
_	Academic scholarship on boundary-work has emphasized that such delineations often have high stakes involved for the participants, and carries with it the implication that such boundaries are flexible and socially constructed.
_	The role was not based on a character in the original series, and was meant to be confined only to the miniseries; in the miniseries Helo is shown giving up a spot on a spaceship fleeing the doomed planet of Caprica, with the implication that he was left to die.
_	The container theory of space is a metaphysical theory according to which space is a background against which objects rest and move, with the implication that it can continue to exist in the absence of matter.
_	The reputation of the Queen, already tarnished by gossip, was ruined by the implication that she participated in a crime to defraud the crown jewelers of the cost of a very expensive diamond necklace.
_	As for the implication that dislocations cannot cause persistent unemployment, some theories of economic cycles accept Say's law and seek to explain high unemployment in other ways, considering depressed demand for labour as a form of local dislocation.
_	Other delegates—including future Bill of Rights drafter James Madison—disagreed, arguing that existing state guarantees of civil liberties were sufficient and that any attempt to enumerate individual rights risked the implication that other, unnamed rights were unprotected.
_	No explanation for the return of the O'Malley personality was given, however the persona would appear again near the end of season 13's finale, with the implication that it had become ingrained into his psyche during his time with the Omega AI and had simply lain dormant until triggered upon learning nobody had been searching for Doc when he disappeared, and became semi-active during the final battle against Hargrove's forces.
_	Although Edgerly claimed in the 1900 edition of "The Book of General Membership of the Ralston Health Club" that the letters for the word RALSTON came from Regime, Activity, Light, Strength, Temperation, Oxygen and Nature, earlier editions of the same book are credited to "Everett Ralston", a pseudonym of Edgerly, with the implication that Ralstonism is named after this fictitious person.
_	However, the descriptions given by several authors make it clear that, except in its use in narrative, it should be classified as one of the perfect tenses, since like the Perfect it usually carries the implication that the effect of the action still holds.
_	The Slavonic text, however, could be read as asking God to "replace" one kind of spirit or breath with another, with the implication that the first kind of spirit (line 1) does "not" come from God to begin with.
_	No matter what she did, there was the implication that she would ultimately go mad.
_	Traditional American usage equates "free range" with "unfenced," and with the implication that there was no herdsman keeping them together or managing them in any way.
_	In this case Hugo integrated the little epics into his poetical system by casting them as the "human" panel in a triptych of which "God" and "Satan" were the wings, with the implication that they were merely sparse fragments stolen from a greater epic: the whole of human experience itself.
_	The 'so far' tense is used when talking about what has happened so far, with the implication that more is to come.
_	Geoffrey of Monmouth asserted that Arthur "was mortally wounded" at Camlann but was then carried "to the Isle of Avallon ("insulam Auallonis") to be cured of his wounds", with the implication that he would at some point be cured and return therefrom made explicit in Geoffrey's later "Vita Merlini".
_	According to John Woods, Islamic history professor at the University of Chicago, it was not simply the depiction of Muhammad that was offensive, but the implication that Muhammad was somehow a supporter of terrorism.
_	On 5 July 2018, Episode 1 was uploaded to YouTube, with the implication that more would follow.
_	It is commonly used with the implication that the people who claim to support the rights of the working class are themselves members of the ruling classes and are therefore out of touch with the real needs of the people they claim to support and protect.
_	He later objected on principle to the implication that he was "expected to answer" to issues raised by "Iluzia anticomunismului".
_	The novel ends with Marie and Richard sailing to France (where they will stay until the gossip dies down) and Marcel deciding to become a photographer in order to earn his living (with the implication that once he has some success he will marry Anna Bella).
_	With this came, most importantly, the implication that "acquired" characteristics of an organism—for example, the state of being leafless as a result of having been plucked—could be inherited by that organism's descendants.
_	Johnson's campaign was widely criticized for using the prospect of nuclear war, as well as for the implication that Goldwater would start one, to frighten voters.
_	7-Keto-DHEA is marketed as a dietary supplement with the implication that it may accelerate weight loss, increase metabolism, enhance memory, or prevent age-related changes.
_	A value for formula_31 measured from standard candle observations of Type Ia supernovae, which was determined in 1998 to be negative, surprised many astronomers with the implication that the expansion of the universe is currently "accelerating" (although the Hubble factor is still decreasing with time, as mentioned above in the Interpretation section; see the articles on dark energy and the ΛCDM model).
_	Whatever the literal meaning and traditional prestige of the ruler's actual title, the British government translated them all as "prince," to avoid the implication that the native rulers could be "kings" with status equal to that of the British monarch.
_	In humans, evidence of a frameshift mutation in the bHLH domain of "HAND1" has been correlated with hypoplastic left heart syndrome (a serious form of congenital heart disease where the left side of the heart is severely underdeveloped), aiding in the implication that "HAND1" expression is a factor to patients suffering from the disease.
_	However, alongside other key producers in the scene, LTJ Bukem, arguably the single most influential figure behind the style, is especially noted for disliking the term, owing to the implication that other forms of drum and bass are not intelligent.
_	In January 1968, Griffith wrote on behalf of the MCC to the South African Cricket Association (SACA) with the implication that the tour would be cancelled if a free selection was not guaranteed.
_	He also claimed that the agreement was void because his sons were taken hostage with the implication that his word alone could not be trusted.
_	Nevertheless, the implication that triadic relations are structured to perpetuate themselves leads to a level of complexity not usually experienced in the routine of message creation and interpretation.
_	The uncensored version of the video shows the band playing with and eating a brown semi-liquid food, with the implication that it is feces, and a beginning which features them feigning sex in a doggy-style position rather than dancing as in the clean version.
_	However, later, it was confirmed that layoffs were not heavily confined to one team or another, countering early rumors that the teams were specifically targeted—countering the implication that the under performance of certain games might have been the catalyst.
_	Though he praised Modell and the climax, he felt that Holly was a stereotype and "the implication that Modell is able to get through to her because of her fear walks that weird line between plausible and not entirely necessary".
_	Miller states that Hubbard was a disciple of Aleister Crowley, with the implication that Scientology derives from Crowley's teachings, but Frenschkowski concludes, "Nevertheless it remains quite obvious that Hubbard did not take much inspiration from Crowley and Parsons."
_	Railway surgeons were generally skeptical of the condition and disliked the implication that there was an injury peculiar to just railways.
_	The storyline ends with the implication that the personalities may not have been as fabricated as Todd believed them to be.
_	Another aspect of the term is the implication that the only point of eating is to promote bodily health.
_	The Canadian ethnobotanist Wade Davis, who did research related to the implication that tetrodotoxin was present, hypothesized how this might have been done.
_	In the 2010 revival of "Upstairs, Downstairs", Rose Buck refers to her late Master, Lord Richard Bellamy of Haversham, with the implication that Richard had died sometime between 1930 and 1936.
_	Konietzko gave him more freedom to use whatever themes he wished, resulting in the cover to "Money", which Hughes said "was based upon my disillusionment with the street lifestyle I was experiencing at the time, and the art carries with it the implication that no matter what temptation lies in your path, you still gotta pay!"
_	The film ends on the implication that the three sisters will have many other adventures together.
_	In the original script, the movie was supposed to have concluded in the graveyard, with Martin the gravedigger meeting Jason's father, Elias—a heretofore unseen character in the series—with the implication that Elias knows Jason has been resurrected and has come looking for him.
_	Middle-class children remained in education for longer periods, with the implication that they had less time to make their own toys, and were more reliant on commercially manufactured toys.
_	The expression "fig leaf" has a pejorative metaphorical sense meaning a flimsy or minimal cover for anything or behaviour that might be considered shameful, with the implication that the cover is only a token gesture and the truth is obvious to all who choose to see it.
_	Covenants in biblical times were often sealed by severing an animal, with the implication that the party who breaks the covenant will suffer a similar fate.
_	The kids' parents saw Malú on TV and had the implication that Malú and Jorgito were, in fact, traveling towards the lighthouse.
_	The accounts of Micah's idol also include reference to a "Jonathan son of Gershom" as being a priest, and although the masoretic text seems to avoid the implication that non-Aaronim could be priests by describing this particular "Gershom" as a son of "Manasseh" (מנשה), this appears to have been distorted; the letter "nun" (נ) appears here in superscript, suggesting that the text originally described this "Gershom" as the one that was a son of "Moses" (משה).
_	The DSM-V replaced the term "gender identity disorder" with "gender dysphoria" to avoid the implication that gender nonconformity is in itself a mental disorder, but kept the entry so that individuals could still seek treatment.
_	However, she was held responsible for his actions and was ostracised in Paris because of the implication that he was involved with the NKVD.
_	Later, Sansa is awakened by a nightmare of the riots and discovers that she has had her first period, with the implication that she can now be wed to Joffrey Baratheon and bear his children.
_	In addition, there was a tendency in the 1950s to present Wehrmacht leaders as noble and high-minded and thus morally superior to the Allied commanders who had defeated them with the implication that the wrong side had won.
_	Though the individual species are listed in Appendix I, the family as a whole (Manidae) is under Appendix II, with the implication that if additional species are discovered, they will be automatically placed in Appendix II.
_	The connotation of the term "consensus reality" is usually disparaging: it is usually employed by idealist, surrealist and other anti-realist theorists opposing or hostile to this "reality," with the implication that this consensus reality is, to a greater or lesser extent, created by those who experience it.
_	The term is applied to various loopholes and quirks of the military system, always with the implication that rules are inaccessible to and slanted against those lower in the hierarchy.
_	Those accused of heresy were also encouraged to denounce others, with the implication that their own lives might be spared if they did so.
_	Fatalistic Zurvanism resulted from the doctrine of limited time with the implication that nothing could change this preordained course of the material universe and that the path of the astral bodies of the 'heavenly sphere' was representative of this preordained course.
_	Laxalt sued the "Bee" for libel, claiming that the articles' allegations were false, and that the implication that Laxalt associated with members of organized crime was defamatory.
_	Although the reason for "Dotto"'s August cancellation was never given to the press, it was worked out in the days after that the reason was the implication that the game had been fixed.
_	Much reference has been made in the literature (both lay and professional) of the structural kinship of synephrine with ephedrine, or with phenylephrine, often with the implication that the perceived similarities in structure should result in similarities in pharmacological properties.
_	This led to the implication that single words must be focused on in order to activate the inducer-concurrent taste in certain forms of lexical-gustatory synesthesia.
_	During the adventure, Mantis flirts with Vision (with the implication that she has sex with him), but ultimately ends the flirting when she realizes that he has feelings for his estranged wife Scarlet Witch, who is jealous of Mantis and Vision's friendship.
_	These allusions include the clearly visible bullet wound on Mitch; the blood splatter on the motel wall: bullet holes that mysteriously appear after Mitch becomes trapped in the motel; the implication that the ancillary characters have all participated in the situations before; the same dispatch voice heard every time a character calls 911; the inference that Danny has transcended the physical world to find his sister; the use of "Carnival of Souls" (the films share similar themes and storylines); the clerk at the truck stop is named "Sutter" which is an allusion to "Sutter Kane" from John Carpenter's "In the Mouth of Madness", another film with similar themes; mirrored dialogue, scenes and images throughout; the creatures being visible in each story; elements of the production design that include the word "fear" visible in the magazine Sutter is reading; the flyer for "The White Tights" in the Jailbreak segment, Jack's "Only God Can Judge Me" tattoo, and the name of the bar that Danny breaks into: "The Trap".
_	Political Gaians are a relatively recent offshoot of the ecology movement—and get their name from the Gaia hypothesis, a postulate first devised by James Lovelock holding that the biosphere tends to homeorhetic balance or even homeostasis (with the implication that human beings should be working toward such balances or states.)
_	with the implication that it is a concept that is socially and historically constructed where a discourse of truth is enabled.
_	The casting of Keith Allen as "the Dealer" was a reference Allen's role in "Shallow Grave," with the implication that Allen plays the same character in both and that his death instigates the plot of "Shallow Grave".
_	Imperfective past tenses can also have a discontinuous implication, such as the English "I used to live in London", which carries the implication that the speaker no longer lives there.
_	It also described the degrees as “worthless” and listed the school along with correspondence courses, with the implication that the university was a diploma mill.
_	In the Gospel of John (), John the baptist speaks in terms of himself as a "best man" with the implication that Christ the bridegroom (see also Matthew ) is coming to meet his bride, although there is nothing specific to identify the bride.
_	Rather, we have to remove the implication that positive liberty requires collective control over affairs which is derived from the conscious and expressed decisions of men.
_	At the original trial he had instructed the jury that to believe Campbell and Steele's assertions was to accept that "not one or two or four but a large number of detectives have deliberately come here to perjure themselves, to build up a false case against an accused person" and to accept the implication that there had been a conspiracy by police officers of the "most sinister and serious kind" to "saddle the accused wrongly with the crimes of murder and attempted murder, and a murder of a horrendous nature".
_	The film ends with the implication that Ruggiero is about to be killed for allowing Pistone to infiltrate the family, whereas Napolitano and Anthony Mirra were the "soldiers" to die in real life.
_	The situation is complicated by the eventual contact with alien civilizations; humanity eventually splits into many subspecies, with the implication that many of these effectively vanish from the galaxy, reminiscent of The Singularity in the works of Vernor Vinge.
_	In a statement responding to the revelations, the NSA said "the implication that NSA's foreign intelligence collection is arbitrary and unconstrained is false."
_	Gibson suggests that the implication that only MacLaren could have guided England to victory must have had a demoralising effect on the remaining batsmen, and speculates that he felt guilty over the composition of a team that looked likely to lose.
_	Proust challenged Lorrain to a duel over the implication that Proust and Daudet were lovers.
_	The "Sarei" decision, though based on prudential rather than statutory factors, seems to reject the implication that "Sosa" leaned toward not recognizing an exhaustion requirement.
_	Christian theology was often used to justify this split, with the implication that it was God's plan to have people separated by race.
_	For instance Beckett's "Waiting For Godot" is considered a tragicomedy, a play with elements of tragedy and satire, with the implication that interpreting textual elements in the play becomes difficult as the two opposing seasons and conventions that Frye associated with genres are pitted against each other.
_	"Gizmodo" criticized Pai's appearance on "Jimmy Kimmel Live!", saying that he refused to debate Oliver's points and instead "addresses a bunch of Twitter eggs", anonymous user profiles, "with the implication that anyone who opposes his cash grab for corporations is a moron".
_	The Book of Ezekiel implies that the rules about animals which die of natural causes, or are "torn by beasts", were adhered to only by the priests, and were intended only for them; the implication that they did not apply to, and were not upheld by, ordinary Israelites was noticed by the classical rabbis, who declared "the prophet Elijah shall some day explain this problematic passage".
_	This move was criticized, as commentators believed that it was meant primarily to suppress the sale of products deemed as competition to Amazon Fire TV products, given that Amazon itself had deliberately refused to offer software for its own streaming services on these devices, and the action contradicted the implication that Amazon.com was a general online retailer.
_	In China, the term tofu dregs (the pieces left over after making tofu) is widely used as a metaphor for shoddy work, hence the implication that a "tofu-dreg project" is a poorly executed project for which the government should accept responsibility.
_	In the 1920s and 1930s almost every major cosmologist preferred an eternal steady state Universe, and several complained that the beginning of time implied by the Big Bang imported religious concepts into physics; this objection was later repeated by supporters of the steady state theory, who rejected the implication that the universe had a beginning.
_	Maggie and Brick reconcile, and the two kiss, with the implication that they will possibly make Maggie's "lie" become "truth".
_	Adolescents are approximately 30% better off in their ability to cope with mental health issues than those that do not participate in a psychotherapeutic treatment making the implication that adventure therapy effectiveness is comparable to the effectiveness of psychotherapeutic treatment.
_	Contemporary analysis of archaeobotanical samples by Robin Dennell and others had recognised this variation, with the implication that ancient seed assemblages could not be treated uncritically as representative of crop use, but had not identified the close association with crop processing stages.
_	In some instances, there was also the implication that the "idiot" was in fact a Jewish caricature.
_	Likewise, the implication that Iraq was involved in the 9-11 attacks
_	The cars were refurbished and painted in the older Victorian Railways scheme of blue with gold stripes, to avoid the implication that the vehicles were of the same quality as newer, air-conditioned stock.
_	Both Mraz and Caillat look back and the video ends with the implication that both of them see one another.
_	The claims—shocking for the implication that most of Thai history would have to be rewritten—led to intense, often heated, scholarly debate, joined by dozens of academics both making rebuttals as well as giving support.
_	This precise "Compton periodicity" of a matter wave is said to be the necessary condition for a clock, with the implication that any such matter particle may be regarded as a fundamental clock.
_	A "mangubat" was a man who left his homeland, family, and people for war adventure, mainly for tattooing for honor and fame or sometimes for slave-raiding, with the implication that he planned to return home with his newly won fortune and fame.
_	This rift exploded in June, when Paul MacEwan, the NDP MLA for Cape Breton Nova, was expelled from the party due to his constant public airing of internal party disputes, including the implication that Akerman resigned due to "Trotskyist elements" from the mostly mainland-based provincial council.
_	The article outlines why Reed College chooses not to participate in the rankings competition process, and addresses the implication that non-participation necessarily handicaps colleges in competing for student applications and enrollment.
_	The film has come under fire from some women's rights authors for a seeming misportrayal of Virginia's difficulties and the implication that accepting a subservient role as a wife and mother is part of her "cure".
_	Some, including R.H. Charles, suggest that "biters" should read "bastards", but the name is so unusual that some believe that the implication that is made by the reading of "biters" is more or less correct.
_	Regarding the specific charges towards the CIA, the DOJ wrote "the implication that the drug trafficking by the individuals discussed in the "Mercury News" articles was connected to the CIA was also not supported by the facts."
_	Rather, many biologists resisted the implication that megabats and microbats (or echolocating bats) formed distinct branches of mammalian evolution, with flight having evolved twice.
_	Miranda is dead and her spirit is seeking a new host body, the Hybrids do not exist, and the matches are ranked at different "levels" (Levels 1–5, with the implication that the penalties for losing differ, depending on the level of a given match), among other things.
_	This statement is a consequence of the implication that for to be invertible it must be bijective.
_	He draws the implication that foreign donor countries are thereby financing Israel's occupation.
_	Whites defined the event as a race riot, with the implication that blacks were rioting.
_	Fleurette's mother is never mentioned, except for the implication that she was not involved in her daughter's upbringing within Fleurette's memory.
_	He also complained about the implication that "Queensland Airlines" was guilty of causing the crash and said legal counsel for some of the parties were using the Coroner's inquest to prepare for legal action against "Queensland Airlines".
_	The Irish public was outraged by the implication that budgetary cuts were being decided in Berlin and not Dublin.
_	Together, these two hypotheses carry the implication that, given long periods of material affluence, a growing part of society will embrace post-materialist value systems, an implication which has been indeed borne out internationally in the past 30 years of survey data.
_	In the late 1980s, the pediatrician Benjamin Spock said that the cartons terrified small children at the breakfast table with the implication that they, too, might be abducted.
_	It is often applied by contrarian writers in a derogatory sense, with the implication that the masses of investors tend to blindly follow trends without regard to the underlying dynamics of the financial markets, often with long-term disastrous results.
_	In 2010 a Super Bowl ad by the U.S. Air Force Reserve caused The White Stripes to "take strong insult and objection to the Air Force Reserve presenting this advertisement with the implication that we licensed one of our songs to encourage recruitment during a war that we do not support."
_	The purpose is to drive out and dispossess the Canaanites, with the implication that there are to be no treaties with the enemy, no mercy, and no intermarriage.
_	Metzger's comments received a very positive reaction in Armenia, particularly at the implication that more Israelis are changing their positions on using the word "genocide" to refer to the Armenians.
_	"To face the implication that nothing was written down until after Jesus died was itself a shock.
_	The second possibility is that the link between saturated fats and CHD is valid, but that some additional factor in the typical Israeli diet, lifestyle or genes creates another CHD risk—presumably with the implication that if this factor can be identified, it can be isolated in the diet and / or lifestyle of other countries, thereby allowing both the Israelis, and others, to avoid that particular risk.
_	One of the nuns had a wet and torn gown and with tears told the representative of "tales of horror" and begged for "protection against the outrages of hypocrisy" (which gives the implication that Padre Salvi regularly rapes her when he is present).
_	But I don’t see why the question was dismissed so readily, with the implication that only a tool of the fossil-fuel industry would raise it."
_	Jack demands to know why the man won't let Jack die, with the implication that the old man is either Death, God, or Satan.
_	In 1963, the school name was changed once more, to Kingsway College, reflecting a curriculum that included a complete academic program while decreasing the implication that the school was only a Bible college.
_	He also shows no interest whatsoever in his granddaughter's plight and resents the implication that she is in any way his responsibility.
_	"NCR" publisher Thomas C. Fox denied the implication that there was a decades-long animosity between the diocese and the newspaper, noting that Bishop John Sullivan and Bishop Raymond Boland "had cordial relations with "NCR"."
_	The quote became more common as Microsoft's fortunes rose, used with the implication that alleged predatory business attitudes reached even to the programmers:
_	Mosley subsequently retracted the implication that Dennis had lied.
_	This continues until either the victims' spines snap or they die with the implication that both usually occurred at once to all victims of the disease.
_	Zhu Ying points out the prominence of money in the film creates a conflict between traditional Confucian values (such as the implication that the solutions to Wei's problems can be found through the help of authority figures) and modern, capitalist and individualistic society.
_	Possibly in defence of his focus on so much "unpoetical" material, Pound quotes Rodolphus Agricola to the effect that one writes "to move, to teach or to delight" ("ut moveat, ut doceat, ut delectet"), with the implication that the present cantos are designed to teach.
_	He studied medical textbooks by Thomas Willis, Thomas Sydenham and Nicholas Culpeper, as well as learning the Dutch language with the implication that he probably intended going to Leiden University for a medical degree.
_	The kids' parents saw Malú on TV and had the implication that Malú and Jorgito were, in fact, traveling towards the lighthouse.
_	Carpender told Lieutenant General Frank Berryman that he "resented the implication that Uncle Sam's Navy was letting [the Australians] down at Finschhafen."
_	They stash the weapons away prior to the arrival of law enforcement and proceed, along with a surviving henchman, to corroborate each other's innocence, with the implication that what happened in Wesley's house will remain a secret.
_	However, some people feel it has a negative connotation, with the implication that a handout is unearned and undeserved.
_	He also stated they "will try to pass for freeman" perhaps presenting forged freedom papers with the implication that one or both may have been literate.
_	The motto of the institution is "For God And Country", with the implication that God comes first.
_	Carl then lends George a Ferrari under the implication that he "takes care of his friends", which George uses to drive to see Stacie.
_	As such, it does not fit the strict definition of a truss (since it contains non-two-force members): regular trusses comprise members that are commonly assumed to have pinned joints, with the implication that no moments exist at the jointed ends.
_	Transmutation threatened the essential distinction between man and beast, and implied progressive improvement with the implication that the lower orders could aspire to the privileges of their aristocratic overlords.
_	Underlying this criticism is the implication that having Palang Dharma Party members in parliament would seem to legitimize Santi Asoke, and by extension appear to allow for the creation of a new Thai Buddhist order which would disrupt religious and political stability within the nation.
_	Livesey identifies the implication that winners must be allowed to enjoy the fruits of their enterprise and their risk-taking without these rewards being taken away by the losers.
_	"Versifier" is often used to refer to someone who produces work in verse with the implication that while technically able to make lines rhyme they have no real talent for poetry.
_	Others at the council believed that denying the Theotokos title would carry with it the implication that Jesus was not divine.
_	The term is generally considered a pejorative by some who believe it carries the implication that Christianity as it is known is a corruption of the original teachings of Jesus, as in the doctrine of the Great Apostasy.
_	"Behind the sofa" is a British pop culture phrase describing the fearful reaction of hiding behind a sofa to avoid seeing frightening parts of a television programme, with the implication that one wants to remain in the room to watch the rest of the programme.
_	In September 2013, Jesse contacts Tad for help regarding Russian criminal Yuri Koslov, leaving the implication that Tad may be returning to Pine Valley in the immediate future.
_	Leggio was infuriated with the implication that he was a bastard.
_	A half range Fourier series is a Fourier series defined on an interval formula_1 instead of the more common formula_2, with the implication that the analyzed function formula_3 should be extended to formula_4 as either an even (f(-x)=f(x)) or odd function (f(-x)=-f(x)).
_	He was found guilty of both charges, though not guilty of the fourth and fifth specifications of the first charge, and the implication that he had retreated in the first specification of the second charge was stricken.
_	Experiments on animals have pointed to the possibility that erucic acid, consumed in large quantities, may cause heart damage, although Indian researchers have published findings that call into question these conclusions and the implication that the consumption of mustard or rapeseed oil is dangerous.
_	Freeze had apparently used the drug on himself and his wife, Nora, but to no avail, infuriating Freeze with the implication that Evers had sent him the tape to taunt him.
_	In this usage, it has the meaning of a simple past tense, and the implication that the result of the action still holds does not apply.
_	Controversially, the play ended with the implication that Lucius had killed Aaron's baby, despite his vow not to.
_	Such portraits have always been associated with sitters of high status, with the implication that a noble warrior or ruler was depicted.
_	This argument goes that the constructed link between domestic work and femininity carries the implication that it is often referred to as 'domestic help,' and that domestic workers are referred to as 'nannies' or 'maids.'
_	With the fall of Richmond, Virginia, in April 1865, Semmes supervised the destruction of all the squadron's nearby warships and was then acted as a brigadier general in the Confederate States Army with the implication that he was appointed to that grade.
_	This has the implication that there is one or more infinite-dimensional representation of the Lorentz group acting on Fock space.
_	In "The Television Companion" (1998), David J. Howe and Stephen James Walker criticised Romana's bizarre regeneration, the implication that the Daleks were now robots, and David Gooderson's Davros, believing the character was not only harmed by being played by a lesser actor but that he was also not as well written.
_	Previous ads had featured elderly actors with the implication that incontinence did not prevent them from carrying out active lives.
_	In Callander, Newman, and Holt's (2012) study, White participants self-disclosed their racial identity less often than non-White participants, with the implication that Whiteness was the norm and non-Whites expected to self-disclose their racial identity.
_	The book ends with the implication that the Dashwood sisters will remain closer to each other than their husbands as the narrator says:"Between Barton and Delaford, there was that constant communication which strong family affection would naturally dictate;-and among the merits and the happiness of Elinor and Marianne, let it not be ranked as the least considerable, that though the sisters, and living almost within sight of each other, they could live without disagreement between themselves, or producing coolness between their husbands".
_	This leads to the implication that some complicity was possible in the murder of Becket by the baron Ranulf de Broc.
_	Practitioners tend to treat deviations from what a rational agent would do as 'errors of irrationality', with the implication that cognitive bias mitigation can only be achieved by decision makers becoming more like rational agents, though no explicit measures for achieving this are proffered.
_	Baelish mentions to Roose Bolton in a conversation how the alliance of the North and the Vale brought down the Targaryens, the "mightiest dynasty" in Westerosi history with the implication that a new alliance might have similar effects.
_	Although the film is dedicated to George Bernard Shaw—with the implication that it is based on his play "Pygmalion"—according to Dev Anand, the film is inspired by "My Fair Lady".
_	Little is known about them, other than the implication that they have the power and will to aid Candy in her inadvertent quest to save the Abarat from Christopher Carrion and his grandmother and the statement that they constantly study and protect the history of the universe.
_	Although Batman deduces the truth and captures Heath, he is left troubled at the implication that Heath is correct in his statement that Batman creates his own villains.
_	An example of such a "comical oxymoron" is "educational television": the humour derives entirely from the claim that it is an oxymoron by the implication that "television" is so trivial as to be inherently incompatible with "education".
_	The first accusation lobbied against Paneb is the charge that he gave Preemhab five of Neferhotep's servants, with the implication that this gift is what secured the position for Paneb, not any legitimate claim to be chief workman.
_	While the two were rarely directly equated, they were often mentioned together, with the implication that the NEP was derived from "ketuanan Melayu".
_	Up to version 013, GoboLinux made no "point releases", in order to avoid the implication that some releases were more stable than others.
_	Reformatting often carries the implication that the operating system and all other software will be reinstalled after the format is complete.
_	In these accounts, cartel figures repeatedly mention they expect Bartlett Díaz to one day become President of Mexico, with the implication that they will prosper as a result.
_	The film ends with the implication that Pam is killed by Tommy Jarvis, but her fate is never revealed in the series.
_	The later totalitarian movements would copy or inherit this claim to speak for the whole nation, with the implication that any opposition to them constituted treason.
_	Regarding the specific charges towards the CIA, the DOJ wrote "the implication that the drug trafficking by the individuals discussed in the "Mercury News" articles was connected to the CIA was also not supported by the facts."
_	Although it can be used for simple narrative of events of earlier today, it usually carries the implication that the result of the action no longer holds true:
_	However, the physicians in the Permanente Medical Group deeply resented the implication that they were directly controlled by Kaiser, and successfully forced him to back off with respect to their part of the organization.
_	In the spring of 2008, working for The National Campaign Fund, Floyd Brown launched what he called "the most internet-intensive effort for an ad debut ever" to disseminate via what he claimed was three to five million emails to conservatives the implication that Barack Obama had been "soft" on crime as a state senator in Illinois before his presidential candidacy.
_	She is taken away, with the implication that she will be executed for treason.
_	An absolute approach can also be applied to time, with, for instance, the implication that there might have been vast epochs of time before the first event.
_	A leaflet was also circulated by Dr. Clifford refuting the implication that Chiozza Money was an atheist.
_	TCI's vice president of programming was quoted in "The New York Times" as saying, "I resent the implication that they are the women's network.
_	European rulers often tried to intimidate visiting envoys by displaying maps of their masters' lands and forts, with the implication that the maps were a first step towards conquest.
_	The consensus on Ashton's "Ondine" is that it has some very good things in it – and this is true; as is the implication that it is otherwise unsuccessful, not least because the music (which greatly disappointed Ashton himself) largely fails, except in the storm of Act II and the divertissements of Act III.
_	Rather than holding to an apocalyptic view of attaining socialism through armed revolution, editor Mengshoel was influenced by the ideas of writers Laurence Gronlund and Edward Bellamy, emphasizing the functional superiority of the economic form of state ownership and the implication that evolution to socialist production and distribution would be a protracted, inevitable, evolutionary process.
_	Algis Budrys in 1965 wrote of the "recurrent strain in 'Golden Age' science fiction of the 1940's—the implication that sheer technological accomplishment would solve all the problems, hooray, and that all the problems were what they seemed to be on the surface".
_	William of Tyre, writing about sixty years later, included a detailed account of the proceedings, but neglected to record any of the canons themselves, which he felt were well-known and could be found in any local church; however, he also probably wanted to avoid the implication that the early Kingdom was not as heroic as his generation remembered it.
_	The film ends with Carole, accompanied by Alice, walking away from Steve, with the implication that Steve and Alice will wed and the three would be together as a family.
_	"Feeding," for example, tends to "explain the joke," and does not let the poem build to the implication that the soul itself is culpable in man's struggle for spirit over the corporal self.
_	However, these are removed from his body after his final battle with Train by Eve. Train and Chronos allow Creed to walk away, and he is last seen living with Echidna in a country villa, using a wheelchair, with the implication that the physical and mental injuries he sustained in his fight with Train left him vegetative.
_	He runs to the family's quarters fearing the implication that "journey" in this case provides, but it is too late.
_	In the case of those uprooted in war (category 6), the implication that refugees and IDPs always count as war victims is too simple.
_	A language is "typed" if the specification of every operation defines types of data to which the operation is applicable, with the implication that it is not applicable to other types.
_	But now finding her bird is dead, with a broken neck (with the implication that the husband killed it) it is evident Mrs. Wright killed her husband.
_	On the pretext that the supposed loan and issuance would be politically unpopular, and with the implication that it was a bit of sharp practice by bank insiders, the entire operation was conducted in an atmosphere of deep secrecy.
_	This has the implication that a declaration of independence is unnecessary as Taiwan is already independent.
_	At the same time, it also has the implication that the pledge by Chen to preserve the status quo or not change Taiwan's sovereign status would not preclude a declaration of independence but would preclude acceptance of the one China policy.
_	Franklin regards it not only as implausible, but the implication that Hanna chose the job and acted as she did because of her illiteracy appears intended to exonerate her.
_	Some opponents have said that users may feel belittled by the implication that "certain people" are confused by wiki markup and therefore need the VisualEditor.
_	Illusory contours are characterized by the appearance of contours due to the implication that they are there.
_	By extension, handwaving is used in literary, film and other media criticism of speculative fiction to refer to a plot device (e.g., a scientific discovery, a political development, or rules governing the behavior of a fictional creature) that is left unexplained or sloppily explained because it is convenient to the story, with the implication that the writer is aware of the logical weakness but hopes the audience will not notice or will suspend disbelief regarding such a macguffin, "deus ex machina", continuity error or plot hole.
_	In much the same manner, the Yiddish term for "Jew" (,) "Yid", (singular), "Yidn" (plural)) — originally a benign term — was once used as an ethnic slur, but now is often used by Jews in praise, to describe an upstanding religiously observant Jew (e.g., "He's such a "Yid", giving up his time like that") or to distinguish upstanding religiously observant Jews from non-observant, with the implication that the latter would be better people if they were stricter in their observance (e.g., ""Yidn" wouldn't do such a thing").
_	Suwari waza originated in the martial culture of the samurai who were expected to respond to various attackers from the seated position, with the implication that these codified techniques helped in the improvement of body stability, the maintenance of the Ki (the Japanese equivalent of the Chinese Qi), balance, and strengthening kokyu-ho (breathing power).
_	There is the implication that throughout all times there have been recurring incarnations of Constantine who contain the spark of magic.
_	Critics of cults use the phrase with the implication that the "love" is feigned and that the practice is psychological manipulation in order to create a feeling of unity within the group against a society perceived as hostile.
_	The tone of the song is bittersweet; the succinct lyrics include the assertion that the divine witnesses human suffering ("he hears the babies crying / he sees the old folks dying") and include the implication that being seen, and loved, might comfort.
_	Though few would question Arab influence on non-Arab Muslim faith and culture or Arab Muslim influence on non-Muslim Arabs, the implication that they both find their ultimate expression and fulfilment in al-Faruqi's interpretation of Arabism might be regarded by some as an attempt to establish the hegemony of Arab Islam or, more precisely, Arab Muslim culture.
_	He agrees to help the youth group, and the book ends with the implication that one part of his life is finally over and that another has begun.
_	Press reports complained at the implication that the police were lying.
_	As a manager, Cornette was known for both his loud mouth and for his ever-present tennis racket, which Cornette often used to ensure victory for his wrestlers, with the implication that the racket case was loaded.
_	Further controversy ensued when the "Daily Mirror" newspaper reported that the band had used two backing singers offstage as part of their performance on "Eurovision: Making Your Mind Up", with the implication that this had given the group an advantage over rival entrants, although this was perfectly allowed.
_	Following the announcement, Earls faced criticism from government officials for its decision to stop using domestic beef; Rob McNabb, head of the Canadian Cattlemen's Association, criticized the implication that Canadian cattle producers were not working towards humane cattle raising practices, and stated that they were "second to none in ensuring the welfare of their animals".
_	Roy Copperud said it was used by Republicans who disliked the implication that "Democratic Party" implied to listeners that Democrats "are somehow the anointed custodians of the concept of democracy".
_	Usually they are socially marginal, but Rib-Hadda of Byblos calls Abdi-Ashirta of Amurru (modern Lebanon) and his son 'Apiru, with the implication that they have rebelled against their common overlord, the Pharaoh.
_	The verbal expression "used to" expresses past states or past habitual actions, usually with the implication that they are no longer so.
_	The resulting structure was often pointed out to passengers on steamships going up the Hudson, with the implication that it was the ideally tasteful home of a man of wealth.
_	LeDoux argues that Pavlovian fear conditioning should be renamed Pavlovian threat conditioning to avoid the implication that "fear" is being acquired in rats or humans.
_	He noted that the groups were divided over the practice of Vodou, with the implication that the elites did not recognize Vodou because they connected it to an evil practice.
_	Up with the implication that this had given the group an advantage over rival entrants, although this was perfectly allowed.
_	The "Times" article includes no crime statistics for Crothersville that might affirm the implication that the town was dangerous.
_	During a January 2010 interview, Khan referred to the implication that the event was a publicity stunt for the film as "lowdown and cheap."
_	"Memory and Five Mile Creek" was included in the National Gallery of Victoria's 2004–05 exhibition "Aboriginal Art Post 1984" and reviewer Miriam Cosic, while noting its "naive charm", also drew attention to the work's title and the implication that, like other more explicitly political painters of her era, "she too is talking of violent dispossession".
_	Note that this has the implication that,
_	Solving the integral subsequently yields formula_24, with the implication that the comoving distance between two galaxies increases exponentially as time goes on.
_	The second metric may be introduced at high energies, with the implication that the speed of light could be energy-dependent, enabling models with a variable speed of light.
_	In the first reference, in , Lot offers his virgin daughters to the people of Sodom for sexual purposes in an attempt to protect his guests (cf. Genesis 19:4-11), with the implication that the people of Sodom would be more likely to accept the offer in view of the girls' virginity than they would otherwise.
_	One suggestion is that the treatment of Incitatus by Caligula was an elaborate prank, intended to ridicule and provoke the senate, rather than a sign of insanity, or perhaps a form of satire, with the implication that a horse could perform a senator's duties.
_	The carriers called them "monkey cups," a name I had heard elsewhere in reference to "Nepenthes", but the implication that monkeys drink the pitcher fluid seemed farfetched.
_	The origin of the term is the implication that a crew member was around when the ship was being built and commissioned, and therefore has bragging rights to the "ownership" of one of the planks in the main deck.
_	The phrase was especially common in the context of the exploitation of minors, with the implication that children and young women in such circumstances were not free to decide their own fates.
_	In 1916 the conventions of both the Democratic and Republican parties endorsed women's suffrage, but only on a state-by-state basis, with the implication that the various states might implement suffrage in different ways or (in some cases) not at all.
_	There is usually the implication that Gordon is smart enough to solve the mystery, but chooses not to in order to preserve Batman's effectiveness and maintain his own plausible deniability.
_	While "wa" indicates the topic, which the rest of the sentence describes or acts upon, it carries the implication that the subject indicated by "wa" is not unique, or may be part of a larger group.
_	The idea that physical appearance can denote class, with the implication that modifications in one's physical appearance can be seen as markers of social status extends throughout Brazil.
_	When the BMX bicycle manufacturer, CW Racing became widely known in 1981 this nickname for Frank Post fell into disuse to avoid the implication that Frank Post was a sponsored racer for CW Racing, although he would be later in his career.
_	In the 2010 revival of "Upstairs, Downstairs", Rose Buck refers to her late Master, Lord Richard Bellamy of Haversham, with the implication that Richard had died sometime between 1930 and 1936; Rose later claims that "The Bellamys", meaning Richard and Virginia, gave Rose a teapot for all of her hard work when she left their service sometime between 1930 and 1936.
_	The corpuscular theory, with the hypothesis that the corpuscles were subject to forces acting perpendicular to surfaces, explained the same laws equally well, albeit with the implication that light traveled "faster" in denser media; that implication was wrong, but could not be directly disproven with the technology of Newton's time or even Fresnel's time .
_	Another topic of debate is the implication that Determinism has on morality.
_	The "C" also has the implication that forms an "ABC" parallel situation with Airbus and Boeing.
_	Others, especially among the citizen Nisei, were offended by the implication that they were somehow un-American yet ought to fight to risk their lives for a country that had imprisoned them and overridden their rights.
_	Covenants in ancient times were sometimes sealed by severing an animal, with the implication that the party who breaks the covenant will suffer a similar fate.
_	Alfred Hitchcock, the director, later said that "the Navy raised hell" about the implication that their security was so poor.
_	The linguistic expression used to expresses past states or past habitual actions (usually with the implication that they are no longer so), as in, "I used to eat ice cream," or a state of accustomedness, as in, "I am used to eating ice cream."
_	Applied research, for instance, is not necessarily committed to participatory principles and may be initiated and controlled mostly by experts, with the implication that 'human subjects' are not invited to play a key role in science building and the framing of the research questions.
_	Buddhist religious exclusivism may be seen in the implication that those who do not accept the teachings of the Buddha, such as the Eightfold Path, are destined to repeat the cycle of suffering through endless reincarnations; while those who practice the true way can reach enlightenment.
_	In subsequent reruns, animators changed the Oscar in question to that of Don Ameche out of respect for Ngor, and to avoid the implication that Homer killed him for his Oscar.
_	The movie ends on a positive note, with the implication that Norah has reached a positive turning point in her life and is at peace with herself and that Rose will successfully run her business while also looking after her eccentric father and possibly developing a closer relationship with the quietly supportive Winston.
_	What she found most insulting, as she stated in both videos, is the implication that "God killed that woman because you didn't get the meaning of Christmas."
_	Spike resents the implication that he'd be an inadequate leader, and demands his eleven pounds from Dracula.
_	Though there is compunction in the implication that the young man himself will not survive time’s effects, because redemption brought by the granting of everlasting youth is not actual, but rather ideal or poetic.
_	Developmentalist strategies use a Eurocentric viewpoint of development, a viewpoint that often goes hand in hand with the implication that non-European societies are underdeveloped.
_	Other delegates—including future Bill of Rights drafter James Madison—disagreed, arguing that existing state guarantees of civil liberties were sufficient and that any attempt to enumerate individual rights risked the implication that other, unnamed rights were unprotected.
_	As originally written, Jerry Dandrige was more villainous, so Sarandon tried to find various ways to humanize the vampire, including suggesting the implication that the Amy character was the reincarnation of his long-lost love.
_	These were to be interpreted in the context of the availability of health services generally, with the implication that there was room to challenge executive policies if they were unreasonable or applied unfairly.
_	These carry the implication that sexual intercourse might result in injury, emasculation, or castration for the man involved.
_	As well as the funereal aspects of the decor and the scenes of autopsy, the repeated instances of metamorphosis of a character into a werewolf is linked to the advent of death, with the implication that the process of dying reduces man to animal.
_	Thus, the differences between the HDI and GDI were small leading to the implication that gender disparities were irrelevant to human development.
_	Discoveries at Dmanisi, Georgia, which had diverse physical traits and differences in tooth wear, suggest to some scholars that all the contemporary groups of early "Homo" in Africa, including "Homo ergaster", "Homo habilis", and "Homo rudolfensis" are of the same species and should be assigned to "Homo erectus", with the implication that variation between these “species” represents the prolonged evolution of one lineage, rather than interspecific differences.
_	Some other statements in the book are quietly effective at pointing out the implication that humans are simply another species, evolving through the same processes and principles affecting other organisms.
_	The goal becomes less important than the actions used to achieve the goal, with the implication that magic rituals can persist without efficacy because the intent is lost within the act.
_	Even in more equal power dynamic relationships, the reluctant partner may feel coerced into a proposed non-monogamous arrangement due to the implication that if they refuse, the proposer will pursue other partners anyway, will break off the relationship, or that the one refusing will be accused of intolerance.
_	Female graduates of the programme were often referred to somewhat disparagingly as "Rank Starlets", with the implication that their purpose was merely to appear on screen and look glamorous; however Hylton did go on to feature in a number of substantial acting roles with prominent billing.
_	From this, Haeckel drew the implication that languages with the most potential yield the human races with the most potential, led by the Semitic and Indo-Germanic groups, with Berber, Jewish, Greco-Roman and Germanic varieties to the fore.
_	The title made it sound like a number of his earlier LPs, again with the implication that the song choices were made by his audience rather than himself.
_	Physical constant in the sense under discussion in this article should not be confused with other quantities called "constants" that are assumed to be constant in a given context without the implication that they are in any way fundamental, such as the "time constant" characteristic of a given system, or material constants, such as the Madelung constant, electrical resistivity, heat capacity.
_	As Superman becomes increasingly god-like, the implication that all Kryptonians had possessed the same abilities became problematic for writers, making it doubtful that a race of such beings could have been wiped out by something as trifling as an exploding planet.
_	It occasioned a priority dispute after Braikenridge published it in 1733; Stella Mills writes that, while Braikenridge may have wished to establish priority, Maclaurin rather felt slighted by the implication that he did not know theorems in the "Exercitatio" that he had taught for a number of years.
_	In a statement responding to the revelations, the NSA said "the implication that NSA's foreign intelligence collection is arbitrary and unconstrained is false."
_	Their name was chosen in response to the Sicilian Black Hand gangs and carried the implication that the Irish gang was the "white" counter to the growing presence of what they considered "non-white" Italian gangsters and Italian immigrants.
_	I, Kartir was made the 'absolute authority' over the 'order of priests' at the Sassanid court and throughout the empire's regions too, with the implication that all regional Zoroastrian clergies would now for the first time be subordinated to the Persian Zoroastrian clerics of Pars.
_	This atmosphere contrasts with that of the last two lines, which carry the implication that one should drink deeply before the blossoms fall, before the time for parting arrives.
_	Pictures over his portrayal in the film, angered at the implication that he had betrayed Clough in taking the Derby manager's job.
_	The photo of Bausch's performance was previously released on Reddit as well as Twitter with the implication that it was from a Russian mental institution, but its source was quickly identified.
_	A statement from Young to McCary in March 1847 suggested that race had nothing to do with priesthood eligibility, but the earliest known statement about the priesthood restriction from any Mormon leader (including the implication that skin color might be relevant) was made by apostle Parley P. Pratt, a month after McCary was expelled from Winter Quarters.
_	This leads to the implication that only population movements from central Iran could have occasioned the presence of the Jewish dialects in the Hamadan area.
_	Pachomius also formalized the establishment of an "abba" (father) or "amma" (mother) in charge of the spiritual welfare of their monks and nuns, with the implication that those joining the monastery were also joining a new family.
_	Still another source states that Masoandro was one of three traditional wooden houses still standing at the Rova when Madagascar was colonised by the French, with the implication that the name was applied to distinct buildings at various times.
_	Such penalties included monetary punishments, and corporal punishment—including forcing the husband to spend the night at an unmarked grave (with the implication that it could become his grave).
_	In her understanding "an organization that is a knowledge entrepreneur recognizes the multi-faceted nature of knowledge, and the implication that this has for organization learning.
_	In 2006 President Vladimir Putin agreed with the idea of a new "Air and Space Defence Concept" from 2016, but without the implication that it would be a separate service.
_	In discussions of urban planning, the term "pastiche" may describe developments as imitations of the building styles created by major architects: with the implication that the derivative work is unoriginal and of little merit, and the term is generally attributed without reference to its urban context.
_	The implication that patches are not required for appliances is less accurate than the implication that vendors will be less apt to provide swift modular patches without complete reimaging of the devices.
_	In 1963, the school name was changed once more, to Kingsway College, reflecting a curriculum that included a complete academic program while decreasing the implication that the school was only a Bible college.
_	LeDoux has argued that so-called Pavlovian fear conditioning should be renamed Pavlovian threat conditioning to avoid the implication that “fear” is being acquired in rats or humans.
_	The filmmakers vehemently reject, however, the implication that this funding affected the content of the film.
_	An alternative is to interpret the Turtle as John Salusbury and the Phoenix as Queen Elizabeth I, which would explain the chastity of the relationship and the implication that their "child" is something mystical rather than physical.
_	House gets his happy ending with Wilson and, perhaps more importantly, there's the implication that he'll be okay once his friend is gone."
_	Fatalistic Zurvanism resulted from the doctrine of limited time with the implication that nothing could change this preordained course of the material universe and that the path of the astral bodies of the 'heavenly sphere' was representative of this preordained course.
_	"Absalom, Absalom!" juxtaposes ostensible fact, informed guesswork, and outright speculation, with the implication that reconstructions of the past remain irretrievable and therefore imaginative.
_	The Q-Principle leads to the implication that if the speaker did not make a stronger statement (or say more), then its denial is (implied to be) true.
